South Dakota, session 2026, SB28.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-16:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county auditor the person in charge
of an election may authorize the use of a ballot on demand system.
Except as otherwise provided by this section, the governing body of a political
subdivision may authorize the use of a ballot on demand system. If the governing body
of a political subdivision and the board of county commissioners of a county that has
authorized the use of a ballot on demand system have agreed to conduct an election using
the same ballot for the offices, ballot questions, and other contests of each jurisdiction,
the political subdivision must use the ballot on demand system authorized by the county.
For purposes of this section, a "ballot on demand system" is a mechanism that
prints an official ballot on an as-needed basis. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
a ballot on demand system may use blank ballot paper.
Section 2. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in full force
and effect from and after its passage and approval.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.